Utah statutes.
10-2-422.   Conclusive presumption of annexation.

An area annexed to a municipality under this part shall be conclusively presumed to have been validly annexed if:

(1)  the municipality has levied and the taxpayers within the area have paid property taxes for more than one year after annexation; and

(2)  no resident of the area has contested the annexation in a court of proper jurisdiction during the year following annexation.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 389, 1997 General Session

